Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

12-3-50. Powers and duties of department as to historic preservation and promotion.

The Department of Natural Resources shall have the following powers and duties:

To promote and increase knowledge and understanding of the history of this state from the earliest times to the present, including the archeological, Indian, Spanish, colonial, and American eras, by adopting and executing general plans, methods, and policies for permanently preserving and marking objects, sites, areas, structures, and ruins of historic or legendary significance, such as trails, post roads, highways, or railroads; inns or taverns; rivers, inlets, millponds, bridges, plantations, harbors, or wharves; mountains, valleys, coves, swamps, forests, or everglades; churches, missions, campgrounds, and places of worship; schools, colleges, and universities; courthouses and seats of government; places of treaties, councils, assemblies, and conventions; factories, foundries, industries, mills, stores, and banks; cemeteries and burial mounds; and battlefields, fortifications, and arsenals. Such preservation and marking may include the construction of signs, pointers, markers, monuments, temples, and museums, which structures may be accompanied by tablets, inscriptions, pictures, paintings, sculptures, maps, diagrams, leaflets, and publications explaining the significance of the historic or legendary objects, sites, areas, structures, or ruins;

To promote and assist in the publicizing of the historical resources of the state by preparing and furnishing the necessary historical material to agencies charged with such publicity; to promote and assist in making accessible and attractive to travelers, visitors, and tourists the historical features of the state by advising and cooperating with state, federal, and local agencies charged with the construction of roads, highways, and bridges leading to such historical points;

To coordinate any of its objectives, efforts, or functions with those of any agency or agencies of the federal government, this state, other states, and local governments having duties, powers, or objectives similar or related to those of the department, and to cooperate with, counsel, and advise them;

To cooperate with, counsel, and advise local societies, organizations, or groups staging celebrations, festivals, or pageants commemorating historical events;

To enter into contracts with both public and private parties in connection with the exercise of the powers and duties of the department under this Code section; and

To send its employees onto property, the title to which is not in the department or the State of Georgia, for the purpose of research and exploration, provided that the express written consent of the owner of such property is first obtained; provided, further, that the findings of such research and exploration shall, by prior agreement, be available to the department in the exercise of its functions under this Code section.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit a person from restoring and utilizing an agricultural structure, including but not limited to barns, erected prior to 1965 that previously promoted Georgia tourist destinations to the traveling public for the purpose of advertising or promoting Georgia products or tourist destinations. The department shall approve applications for such structures so long as no public funds from the State of Georgia are used in connection with such restoration or utilization.

(Ga. L. 1951, p. 789, § 14; Ga. L. 1970, p. 189, § 7; Ga. L. 2013, p. 523, § 1/SB 194; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 12/SB 340.)

Cross references.

- Historic preservation generally, T. 44, C. 10.

Division of Archives and History, T. 45, C. 13, A. 3.

12-3-50.1. Grants for preservation of "historic properties"; additional powers and duties of department.

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of Georgia, in furtherance of its responsibility to promote and preserve the health, prosperity, and general welfare of the people, to encourage the preservation of historic properties which have historical, cultural, and archeological significance to the state.

The State of Georgia is authorized to make grants, as funds are available, to any private or public organization or corporation for the preservation of "historic properties," as that term is defined by Section 301 of the National Historic Preservation Act, 16 U.S.C. 470w.

The Department of Community Affairs shall have the additional powers and duties:

To cooperate with agencies of the federal government, other agencies of the state and political subdivisions thereof, and private organizations and individuals, to direct and conduct a comprehensive state-wide survey of historic properties;

To maintain an inventory and register of historic properties;

To document, research, record, and evaluate the significance of historic properties;

To prepare comprehensive state-wide and regional historic preservation plans;

To provide technical assistance to and cooperate with agencies of the federal government, other agencies of the state and political subdivisions thereof, and private organizations and individuals in the development of historic preservation plans, programs, and projects;

To cooperate with agencies of the federal government, other agencies of the state and political subdivisions thereof, and private organizations and individuals, in order that historic properties are taken into consideration at all levels of planning and development;

To propose programs and activities to protect, preserve, and encourage the preservation of historic properties in this state;

To administer programs of financial and technical assistance for historic preservation projects, including all grants made under authority of this Code section, and to specify the terms and conditions under which any grants of funds are made or used;

To make recommendations on the certification and eligibility of historic properties for tax incentives and other programs of public benefit or assistance;

To perform those duties and responsibilities assigned to the Department of Community Affairs under Article 3 of Chapter 2 of Title 8, under Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 44, and under Article 2 of Chapter 10 of Title 44;

To provide public information and education, technical assistance, and training relating to historic preservation;

To encourage public interest and participation in historic preservation;

To advise and assist the state historic preservation officer, who shall be appointed to serve at the pleasure of the Governor; and

To advise the Governor and the General Assembly on matters relating to historic preservation.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-50.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 399, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2020, p. 38, § 1/SB 473.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted "Community Affairs" for "Natural Resources, through its Division of Historic Preservation" in subsection (c) and substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "department" in paragraph (c)(10).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a misspelling of "archeological" was corrected in subsection (a).

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- State and federal grants programs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-13.

12-3-50.2. Georgia Register of Historic Places.

The Department of Community Affairs shall establish, maintain, and expand an inventory and register of historic places in this state, which register shall be known as the Georgia Register of Historic Places. Such register shall include:

Historic property which is listed in the National Register of Historic Places pursuant to the National Historic Preservation Act (16 U.S.C. Section 470, et seq.); and

Historic property which is defined as districts, sites, buildings, structures, or objects which possess integrity of location, design, setting, materials, workmanship, feeling, and association and which is determined to meet the criteria for listing in the Georgia Register of Historic Places according to the criteria outlined in regulations promulgated by the Board of Community Affairs.

The Department of Community Affairs shall be authorized to remove from the Georgia Register of Historic Places any property which no longer qualifies or meets the criteria for listing in such register.

The Department of Community Affairs shall provide an adequate and qualified state historic preservation review board designated by the state historic preservation officer.

Any person or entity may apply to the Department of Community Affairs to have property included in the Georgia Register of Historic Places. The Department of Community Affairs shall receive evidence, make investigations of such property, consult with other historic preservation experts, and obtain the recommendations of the state historic preservation review board to determine if such property should be included in the Georgia Register of Historic Places.

Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the Department of Community Affairs pursuant to this Code section shall, upon petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order or taking of such action, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the Department of Community Affairs. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the Department of Community Affairs and any party to the hearing, including the Department of Community Affairs, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-3-50.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1598, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2020, p. 38, §§ 2, 9, 11/SB 473.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "Division of Historic Preservation of the Department of Natural Resources" in subsection (b); substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "Department of Natural Resources" in subsection (c); substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "Division of Historic Preservation of the department" at the beginning of paragraph (a)(1) and twice in subsection (d); and, in subsection (e), substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "department" twice, for "Board of Natural Resources", and for "board".

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "16 U.S.C. Section 470" was substituted for "16 U.S.C. 470" in subparagraph (a)(1)(A).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, "Board of Community Affairs" was substituted for "Board of Natural Resources" at the end of subparagraph (a)(1)(B).

Law reviews.

-
For article, "The Tax Abatement Program for Historic Properties in Georgia," see 28 Ga. St. B.J. 129 (1992).
For note on 1989 enactment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 173 (1989).

12-3-51. Grants and gifts to department.

For carrying out any of the objectives stated in Code Section 12-3-50, the department may accept grants and gifts from the federal government; the state government; any county, municipal, or local government; any board, bureau, commission, agency, or establishment of any such government; any other organization, public or private; and any individual or groups of individuals. Such grants or gifts shall be held and administered subject to Code Section 12-3-50, this Code section, and Code Sections 12-3-52 through 12-3-54.

(Ga. L. 1951, p. 789, § 15; Ga. L. 1952, p. 152, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Cross references.

- State grants to municipalities for repair of public facilities declared by General Assembly to be of historical value,

§

36-40-1

.

12-3-52. Archeological exploration, excavation, or surveying; administrative appeal of department orders.

The State of Georgia, acting through the department and its authorized officers and employees, reserves to itself the exclusive right and privilege of exploring, excavating, or surveying all prehistoric and historic sites, ruins, artifacts, treasure, and treasure-trove, and other similar sites and objects found on all lands owned or controlled by the state, provided that this reservation shall not apply to property under the jurisdiction of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

All findings of such ruins, artifacts, treasure, treasure-trove, and other similar sites and objects shall be reported to the department within two days, Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays excluded, after being found.

The department is authorized to grant permits to or enter into contractual agreements with recognized scientific institutions or qualified individuals to conduct field archeological research or salvage archeology through data recovery on such state properties if, in the opinion of the department, conditions or situations warrant such arrangements or agreements. All such permits and agreements that affect burial sites or burial objects shall be issued by the department in accordance with the procedures outlined in subsection (d) of this Code section. All such information and archeologically significant objects derived from archeological research conducted on state lands shall be utilized solely for scientific or public educational purposes and shall remain the property of the state with the exception of those items required to be repatriated by Public Law 101-601 or by Code Section 44-12-262. In addition, the State of Georgia urges that all archeological research conducted on privately owned land within the boundaries of the state be likewise undertaken solely by recognized scientific institutions or qualified individuals.

The department shall issue permits and enter into contractual agreements with recognized scientific institutions or qualified individuals for the purposes enumerated in subsection (c) of this Code section on all state owned or state controlled lands.

Applicants or contractors shall submit a detailed research plan for conducting such field archeological research or salvage archeology which outlines the location, objectives, scope, methods, and expected results.

If burial sites are involved, the research plan or design must include a plan for identifying and notifying lineal descendants, for skeletal analysis, and for curation and disposition as prescribed by Public Law 101-601 or by Part 1 of Article 7 of Chapter 12 of Title 44.

The department, as custodian of all prehistoric and historic sites, ruins, artifacts, treasure, and treasure-trove, and other similar sites and objects found on state owned or state controlled lands, is empowered to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to preserve, survey, protect, recover, and repatriate such findings.

Permits may be renewed upon or prior to expiration upon such terms and conditions as the department deems appropriate.

A permit may be revoked by the department upon a determination by the department that the permit holder has violated this chapter or any term or condition of its permit. Any determination to revoke or deny a permit may be administratively and judicially reviewed in the manner provided in subsection (e) of this Code section.

Upon issuing a permit or entering into a contract that involves aboriginal, prehistoric, or American Indian burial sites, the department shall send written notice to the Council on American Indian Concerns created by Code Section 44-12-280.

Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the department shall, upon petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order or taking of such action, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the department, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." Persons are "aggrieved or adversely affected" where the challenged action has caused or will cause them injury in fact and where the injury is to an interest within the zone of interests to be protected or regulated by the statutes that the department is empowered to administer and enforce. In the event the department asserts in response to the petition before the administrative law judge that the petitioner is not aggrieved or adversely affected, the administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments on this issue and thereafter make a ruling on same before continuing on with the hearing. The burden of going forward with evidence on this issue shall rest with the petitioner.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 993, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 906, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1790, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 12.)

12-3-53. State archeologist.

In order to implement the protective and research policies as outlined in Code Section 12-3-52, the department will appoint a state archeologist whose duties will be:

To direct, coordinate, and otherwise engage in fundamental archeological research on state lands containing sites or objects of archeological significance and to advise the commissioner of natural resources in permitting or entering into contractual agreements with recognized scientific institutions or qualified individuals to do the same;

To cooperate with other agencies of the state which have authority in areas where sites are located;

To conduct a survey of important archeological sites located on state land and, upon request, to survey and officially to recognize significant archeological sites on privately owned land, thereby encouraging the owner to cooperate with the state to preserve the site;

To conduct salvage archeology through data recovery on state sites threatened with destruction;

To protect, preserve, display, or store objects of archeological significance discovered by field archeology at state sites or discovered during the course of any construction or demolition work;

To establish training programs, either independently or in conjunction with institutions of higher learning, in order to disseminate knowledge concerning archeology and its related disciplines; and

To encourage the dissemination of archeological facts through the print or electronic publication of reports of archeological research conducted by the department.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 993, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 906, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 11/SB 388.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a comma was deleted following "archeologist" in the introductory language, and a comma was deleted following "significance" in paragraph (1).

12-3-54. Penalty.

Any person who intentionally violates Code Section 12-3-52 or who intentionally defaces, injures, destroys, displaces, or removes an object or site of archeological or historical value located on areas as designated in Code Section 12-3-52 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 993, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 906, § 3.)

12-3-55. General provisions; preservation of state owned historic properties.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of community affairs.

"Department" means the Department of Community Affairs.

The heads of all state agencies shall assume responsibility for the preservation of historic properties which are owned by such agency. Prior to acquiring, constructing, or leasing buildings for purposes of carrying out agency responsibilities, each state agency shall use, to the maximum extent, and as operationally appropriate and economically feasible, historic properties available to the agency.

The provisions of this Code section shall be implemented as follows:

Each agency shall commence by not later than December 31, 1998, consistent with the preservation of such properties and the mission of the agency and professional preservation standards established by the department and in consultation with the Department of Community Affairs and with the 1998 Joint Study Committee on Historic Preservation, a study of planning processes which may be required for any preservation as may be necessary to effectuate this Code section;

Not later than February 15, 1999, each state agency to which this Code section will become applicable shall prepare cost estimates for the implementation of this Code section which shall include, but not be limited to, agency implementation costs and personnel utilizations. An annually updated report of such cost estimates shall be presented to the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives and the Appropriations Committee of the Senate during the 1999 and 2000 regular sessions of the General Assembly;

Not later than May 1, 1999, each state agency shall formally adopt a process for developing a preservation program;

Not later than July 1, 1999, each state agency shall commence formulation of a preservation program; and

Not later than July 1, 2000, each state agency shall establish and implement, in consultation with the Department of Community Affairs, a preservation program for the identification, evaluation, and nomination of historic properties to the Georgia Register of Historic Places to further the protection of such historic properties.

Each agency preservation program shall ensure that:

Historic properties under the jurisdiction of the agency are identified, evaluated, and nominated to the Georgia Register of Historic Places;

Historic properties under the jurisdiction of the agency, as they are listed in or may be eligible for the Georgia Register of Historic Places, are managed and maintained in a way that considers the preservation of their historic, archeological, architectural, and cultural values in compliance with historic preservation provisions of this part and gives special consideration to the preservation of such values in the case of properties designated as having historic significance to this state;

The agency's preservation related activities are carried out in consultation with other federal, state, and local agencies, Native American tribes, and the private sector; and

The agency's procedures for compliance with historic preservation provisions of this part:

Are consistent with procedures issued by the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources pursuant to Chapter 16 of this title, the "Environmental Policy Act," as amended;

Provide a process for the identification and evaluation of historic properties for listing in the Georgia Register of Historic Places and the development and implementation of agreements in consultation with the commissioner, local governments, Native American tribes, and the interested public, as appropriate, regarding the means by such adverse effects on such properties will be considered; and

Provide for the disposition of Native American cultural items from state or tribal land in a manner consistent with Section 3(c) of the Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act, 25 U.S.C. Section 3002(c), as amended.

Each state agency shall initiate measures to assure that where, as a result of state action or assistance carried out by a state agency, a historic property is to be substantially altered or demolished, timely steps are taken to make or have made appropriate records, and that such records are then deposited with the Department of Community Affairs for future use and reference.

The head of each state agency shall designate a qualified official to be known as the agency's "preservation officer" who shall be responsible for coordinating that agency's activities under this Code section. Each preservation officer may, in order to be considered qualified, satisfactorily complete training programs established by the Department of Community Affairs.

Consistent with the agency's mission and mandates, all state agencies shall carry out agency programs and projects in accordance with the purposes of this Code section and give consideration to programs and projects which will further the purposes of this Code section.

The commissioner of Community Affairs shall review and comment on plans of transferees of surplus state owned historic properties not later than 90 days after such commissioner's receipt of such plans to ensure that the prehistorical, historical, architectural, or culturally significant values will be preserved or enhanced.

Prior to the approval of any state undertaking which may directly and adversely affect any national historic landmark, the head of the responsible state agency shall, to the maximum extent possible, undertake such planning and actions as may be necessary to minimize harm to such landmark and shall afford the commissioner of Community Affairs an opportunity to comment on the undertaking.

The commissioner of Community Affairs shall establish an annual preservation awards program and provide citations for special achievement to officers and employees of state agencies in recognition of their outstanding contributions to the preservation of historic resources. Such program may include the issuance of annual awards by the Governor to any citizen of the state recommended for such an award by the commissioner of Community Affairs.

The commissioner of Community Affairs shall promulgate regulations under which the requirements of this Code section may be waived in whole or in part in the event of a major natural disaster or an imminent threat to the national security.

Each state agency shall ensure that the agency will not grant a loan, loan guarantee, permit, license, or other assistance to an applicant who, with intent to avoid the requirements of this part, has intentionally and significantly adversely affected a historic property to which the grant would relate or, having legal power to prevent it, allowed such significant adverse effect to occur unless the agency determines that circumstances justify granting such assistance despite the adverse effect created or permitted by the applicant. Each agency shall consult with the commissioner of Community Affairs and shall allow comment on the proposed action.

With respect to any undertaking subject to review under this part which adversely affects any property included or eligible for inclusion in the Georgia Register of Historic Places, the head of such agency shall document any decision made pursuant to this part. The head of such agency may not delegate his or her responsibilities pursuant to this part. Where a memorandum of agreement under this part has been executed with respect to an undertaking, such memorandum shall govern the undertaking and all of its parts.

In actions where the Georgia Department of Transportation is complying with and working under the provisions of Chapter 16 of this title, the "Environmental Policy Act," as amended, for state-aid actions and the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, 16 U.S.C. Sections 4321-4347, as amended, and Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, 16 U.S.C. Section 470, as amended, for federal-aid actions, the Georgia Department of Transportation shall be exempt from the requirements of this Code section.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1037, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 12; Ga. L. 2020, p. 38, §§ 3, 7, 8/SB 473.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote subsection (a), which read: "(a) As used in this Code section, the term

"(1) 'Director' means the director of the Division of Historic Preservation of the department.

"(2) 'Division' means the Division of Historic Preservation of the department."; in paragraph (c)(1), substituted "department" for "division" and "Department of Community Affairs" for "division"; substituted "Department of Natural Resources" for "department" in subparagraph (d)(4)(A); substituted "commissioner" for "director" in subparagraph (d)(4)(B); substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "division" in subsections (e) and (f); and substituted "commissioner of Community Affairs" for "director" in subsections (h), (i), (j), (k) and (l).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, a misspelling of "archeological" was corrected and a comma was inserted following "architectural" near the middle of paragraph (d)(2).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, "commissioner's" was substituted for "director's" in the middle of subsection (h).

12-3-56. Revitalization of central business districts; government presence in historic districts.

As used in this Code section, the term "department" means the Department of Community Affairs.

The General Assembly recognizes that the State of Georgia has undertaken various efforts to revitalize the central business districts and in-town areas of municipalities in this state which have historically served as the centers for growth, commerce, and government in our metropolitan areas. Accordingly, the General Assembly reaffirms the commitment to strengthen those municipalities by encouraging the location of state facilities in central business districts. The General Assembly also reaffirms the commitment to provide leadership in the preservation of historic resources and to acquire and utilize space in suitable buildings of historic, architectural, or cultural significance. To this end, the state agencies shall utilize and maintain, wherever operationally appropriate and economically prudent, historic properties and districts, especially those located in central business areas. When implementing these policies, state agencies shall institute practices and procedures that are sensible, understandable, and compatible with current authority and that impose the least burden on, and provide the maximum benefit to, society.

Whenever operationally appropriate and economically prudent, when locating state facilities, state agencies shall give first consideration to historic properties within historic districts. If no such property is suitable, then state agencies shall consider other developed or undeveloped sites within historic districts. State agencies shall then consider historic properties outside of historic districts, if no suitable site within a district exists. Any rehabilitation or construction that is undertaken pursuant to this order must be architecturally compatible with the character of the surrounding historic district or properties. County, city, and other local governmental agencies are also encouraged to conform to this subsection.

State agencies with responsibilities for leasing, acquiring, locating, maintaining, or managing state facilities or with responsibilities for the planning for, or managing of, historic resources shall take steps to reform, streamline, and otherwise minimize regulation, policies, and procedures that impede the state government's ability to establish or maintain a presence in historic districts or to acquire historic properties to satisfy state space needs, unless such regulations, policies, and procedures are designed to protect human health and safety or the environment. State agencies are encouraged to seek the assistance of the Department of Community Affairs when taking these steps.

In implementation of this part, the Department of Community Affairs and each state agency shall seek appropriate partnerships with local governments, Indian tribes, and appropriate private organizations with the goal of enhancing participation of these parties in the state historic preservation program. Such partnerships should embody the principles of administrative flexibility, reduced paperwork, and increased service to the public.

This Code section is not intended to create, nor does it create, any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by a party against the State of Georgia, its agencies or instrumentalities, its officers or employees, or any other person.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1037, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 38, §§ 4, 7/SB 473.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in subsection (a), substituted "â€˜department'" for "â€˜division'" and "Department of Community Affairs" for "Division of Historic Preservation of the department"; and substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "division" in subsections (d) and (e).

Cross references.

- Community redevelopment generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. VII.

Downtown development authorities, T. 36, C. 42.

City business improvement districts, T. 36, C. 43.

Urban redevelopment, T. 36, C. 61.